Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. CORRECTIONS

CHAPTER 498. INMATE CLASSIFICATION AND GOOD TIME

Sec. 498.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Inmate" means a person imprisoned by order of a court, whether the person is actually imprisoned in a facility operated by or under contract with the institutional division or is under the supervision or custody of the pardons and paroles division.

(2) "Term" means:

(A) the term of confinement in the institutional division stated in the sentence of the convicting court, if the inmate is serving a sentence for a single offense;

(B) the term of confinement established by Section 508.150, if the inmate is serving two or more sentences consecutively; or

(C) the longest term of confinement in the institutional division stated in the sentence of the convicting court, if the inmate is serving two or more concurrent sentences.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 497.001 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.046, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 498.002. CLASSIFICATION AND RECLASSIFICATION. The department shall classify each inmate as soon as practicable on the inmate's arrival at the institutional division and, subject to the requirements of Section 498.005, shall reclassify the inmate as circumstances warrant. Each inmate must be classified according to the inmate's conduct, obedience, and industry. The department shall maintain a record on each inmate showing each classification and reclassification of the inmate with the date and reason for each classification or reclassification. The department may classify each inmate on the inmate's arrival at the institutional division in a time-earning category that does not allow the inmate to earn more than 30 days' good conduct time for each 30 days actually served.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 497.002 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 11.03, eff. Aug. 29, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.047, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 719), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 498.003. ACCRUAL OF GOOD CONDUCT TIME. (a) Good conduct time applies only to eligibility for parole or mandatory supervision as provided by Section 508.145 or 508.147 and does not otherwise affect an inmate's term. Good conduct time is a privilege and not a right. Regardless of the classification of an inmate, the department may grant good conduct time to the inmate only if the department finds that the inmate is actively engaged in an agricultural, vocational, or educational endeavor, in an industrial program or other work program, or in a treatment program, unless the department finds that the inmate is not capable of participating in such a program or endeavor.

(b) An inmate accrues good conduct time according to the inmate's classification in amounts as follows:

(1) 20 days for each 30 days actually served while the inmate is classified as a trusty, except that the department may award the inmate not more than 10 extra days for each 30 days actually served;

(2) 20 days for each 30 days actually served while the inmate is classified as a Class I inmate; and

(3) 10 days for each 30 days actually served while the inmate is classified as a Class II inmate.

(c) An inmate may not accrue good conduct time during any period the inmate is classified as a Class III inmate or is on parole or under mandatory supervision.

(d) An inmate may accrue good conduct time, in an amount determined by the department that does not exceed 15 days for each 30 days actually served, for diligent participation in an industrial program or other work program or for participation in an agricultural, educational, or vocational program provided to inmates by the department. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "participation in an educational program" includes the participation of the inmate as a tutor or a pupil in a literacy program authorized by Section 501.005. The department may not award good conduct time under this subsection for participation in a literacy program unless the department determines that the inmate participated in good faith and with diligence as a tutor or pupil.

(e) If a person is confined in a county jail, the department shall award good conduct time to the person up to an amount equal to the amount earned by an inmate in the entry level time earning class. The department shall award good conduct time to a defendant for diligent participation in a voluntary work program operated by a sheriff under Article 43.101, Code of Criminal Procedure, in the same manner as if the inmate had diligently participated in an industrial program or other work program provided to inmates by the department. The sheriff of each county shall have attached a certification of the number of days each inmate diligently participated in the volunteer work program operated by the sheriff under Article 43.101, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(f) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 1.37(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 497.003 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 86, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.048, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1430, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 1.37(a), (b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 498.004. FORFEITURE AND RESTORATION OF GOOD CONDUCT TIME. (a) If, during the actual term of imprisonment of an inmate in the department, the inmate commits an offense or violates a rule of the department, the department may forfeit all or any part of the inmate's accrued good conduct time or, in accordance with the policy adopted under Subsection (c), place all or any part of the inmate's accrued good conduct time in suspension. The department may not restore good conduct time forfeited under this subsection but may reinstate good conduct time suspended under this subsection.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 4

(b) On the revocation of parole or mandatory supervision of an inmate, the inmate forfeits all good conduct time previously accrued. On return to the institutional division the inmate may accrue new good conduct time for subsequent time served in the division. The department may not restore good conduct time forfeited on a revocation.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.049

(b) On the revocation of parole or mandatory supervision of an inmate, the inmate forfeits all good conduct time previously accrued. On return to the institutional division the inmate may accrue new good conduct time for subsequent time served in the division. The department may restore good conduct time forfeited on a revocation that does not involve a new criminal conviction after the inmate has served at least three months of good behavior in the institutional division, subject to policies established by the division.

(c) The department shall establish a policy regarding the suspension of good conduct time under Subsection (a). The policy must provide that:

(1) the department will consider the severity of an inmate's offense or violation in determining whether to suspend all or part of the inmate's good conduct time instead of forfeiting the inmate's good conduct time;

(2) during any period of suspension, good conduct time placed in suspension may not be used:

(A) for purposes of granting privileges to an inmate; or

(B) to compute an inmate's eligibility for parole under Section 508.145 or to determine an inmate's date of release to mandatory supervision under Section 508.147;

(3) at the conclusion of any period of suspension, the department may forfeit or reinstate the good conduct time placed in suspension based on the inmate's conduct during the period of the suspension; and

(4) in determining whether to forfeit or reinstate good conduct time placed in suspension, the department must consider whether any impact to public safety is likely to result from the inmate's release on parole or to mandatory supervision if the good conduct time is reinstated.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 497.004 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.049, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1251 (H.B. 93), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 719), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 498.0042. FORFEITURE FOR CONTACTING VICTIMS. (a) The department shall adopt policies that prohibit an inmate in the institutional division from contacting by letter, telephone, or any other means, either directly or indirectly, a victim of the offense for which the inmate is serving a sentence or a member of the victim's family, if:

(1) the victim was younger than 17 years of age at the time of the commission of the offense; and

(2) the department has not, before the inmate makes contact:

(A) received written consent to the contact from:

(i) a parent of the victim or the member of the victim's family, other than the inmate;

(ii) a legal guardian of the victim or the member of the victim's family; or

(iii) the victim or the member of the victim's family, if the victim is 17 years of age or older at the time of giving the consent; and

(B) provided the inmate with a copy of the consent.

(b) If, during the actual term of imprisonment of an inmate in the institutional division, the inmate violates a policy adopted under Subsection (a) or an order entered under Article 42.24, Code of Criminal Procedure, the department shall forfeit all or any part of the inmate's accrued good conduct time. The department may not restore good conduct time forfeited under this subsection.

(c) In this section, "family" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.003, Family Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 666, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 670, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 491 (H.B. 1028), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 719), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 498.0045. FORFEITURE OF GOOD CONDUCT TIME: FRIVOLOUS LAWSUITS. (a) In this section, "final order" means a certified copy of a final order of a state or federal court that dismisses as frivolous or malicious a lawsuit, including a proceeding arising from an application for writ of habeas corpus, brought by an inmate while the inmate was in the custody of the department or confined in county jail awaiting transfer to the department following conviction of a felony or revocation of community supervision, parole, or mandatory supervision.

(a-1) For purposes of this chapter, an application for writ of habeas corpus is considered "frivolous" if brought for the purpose of abusing judicial resources.

(b) On receipt of a final order, the department shall forfeit:

(1) 60 days of an inmate's accrued good conduct time, if the department has previously received one final order;

(2) 120 days of an inmate's accrued good conduct time, if the department has previously received two final orders; or

(3) 180 days of an inmate's accrued good conduct time, if the department has previously received three or more final orders.

(c) The department may not restore good conduct time forfeited under this section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 378, Sec. 5, eff. June 8, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1207 (H.B. 681), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 498.005. ANNUAL REVIEW OF CLASSIFICATION; RETROACTIVE AWARD OF GOOD TIME. At least annually, the board shall review the institutional division's policies relating to the manner in which inmates are classified and reclassified, and the manner in which additional good conduct time is awarded retroactively to inmates who have been reclassified.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 497.005 and amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 10.01(a), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 11.04, eff. Aug. 29, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.050, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.